District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.07

Posting of emergency response information.

By July 1, 2008, the Mayor shall develop a standardized form for posting emergency response information. The information shall be posted in all schools and shall include:

(1)

An explanation of the symptoms and possible consequences of conditions covered by this subchapter;

(2)

The names of all the employees or agents of the particular school who are trained and certified to administer medication in emergency circumstances; and

(3)

The emergency response steps, as identified by the Mayor, to be taken by the school.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 8, 54 DCR 12230

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-85, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9362).